Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Chapter 32. Centralized Licensing and Related Administrative Procedures.
Sec. 47.32.170.
Criminal penalty.

A person who intentionally or with criminal negligence violates a provision of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter related to the health and safety of persons served by an entity required to comply with this chapter is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 34 ch 57 SLA 2005)

Sec. 47.32.180.
Confidentiality; release of certain information.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the following are confidential and may not be disclosed to the public without a court order: complaints; investigations; inspections; records related to a complaint, investigation, or inspection; and the identity of a complainant and of individuals receiving services from an entity.

With the exception of information that identifies a complainant or a recipient of services from an entity, a copy of the department’s report of investigation or inspection under AS

47.32.120

, an entity’s written response to the report, and information regarding any department imposition of an enforcement action under AS

47.32.130

or

47.32.140

are public records under AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.295

. The department shall make this information available to the public for inspection and copying within time frames specified in AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.295

or regulations adopted under AS 40.25.100 — 40.25.295 after the

entity receives its copy of the report of investigation under AS

47.32.120

, if the department has determined that an enforcement action under AS

47.32.130

or

47.32.140

will not be taken regarding the entity;

department’s notice of enforcement action under AS 47.32.130 or 47.32.140 becomes a final administrative order without a hearing under AS

47.32.130(c)

or

47.32.140(i)

; or

issuance of a decision following a hearing under AS

47.32.150

.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department may, upon request, share information with a law enforcement agency that is investigating a crime that is also the subject of a licensing investigation obtained during a current investigation.

History.

(§ 34 ch 57 SLA 2005; am § 60 ch 22 SLA 2015; am § 23 ch 69 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For inspections and investigations, see 7 AAC 10, art. 6.

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 57, art. 1.

For administration, see 7 AAC 57, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, in the introductory language of (b), substituted “AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.295

” for “AS 40.25” three times and substituted “time frames” for “timeframes”.

The 2018 amendment, effective July 25, 2018, added (c).

Sec. 47.32.190.
Access to information.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of law, the divisions of the department assigned to implement this chapter shall have access to any information compiled or retained by other divisions of the department, regardless of the nature of the information or whether the information is considered confidential, in order to assist in administering the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 34 ch 57 SLA 2005; am § 24 ch 69 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 25, 2018, substituted “to implement this chapter” for “public health and public assistance functions” following “the department assigned” and made a stylistic change.

Sec. 47.32.200.
Notices required of entities.

An entity shall provide the department with written notice of a change of mailing address at least 14 days before the effective date of the change.

An entity shall notify the department within 24 hours after having knowledge that an administrator, employee, volunteer, or household member, as required by the type of entity under department regulations, has been

convicted of, has been charged by information or complaint with, or is under indictment or presentment for an offense listed in regulations adopted under AS

47.05.310

or a law or ordinance of this or another jurisdiction with similar elements; or

found to have neglected or abused a child as described in AS 47.10.

An entity shall notify the department within 24 hours after having knowledge of any allegation or suspicion of abuse, neglect, or misappropriation of money or other property of an individual receiving services from the entity. The entity shall conduct an investigation and make a written report to the department within five days following notification to the department under this subsection.

Not less than 20 days before the effective date of a decision to relinquish the entity’s license, the entity shall notify the department of the decision.

Not more than one day after signing a contract for sale of the licensed entity, the entity shall notify the department of the sale.

Not less than 30 days before an entity wishes to change the location of the entity, the entity shall notify the department of the change.

History.

(§ 34 ch 57 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing process, see 7 AAC 57, art. 1.

For administration, see 7 AAC 57, art. 2.

Sec. 47.32.900.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“ambulatory surgical center” means a facility that

is not a part of a hospital or a physician’s general medical practice; and

operates primarily for the purpose of providing surgical services to patients who do not require hospitalization;

“assisted living home”

means a residential facility that serves three or more adults who are not related to the owner by blood or marriage, or that receives state or federal payment for services regardless of the number of adults served; the department shall consider a facility to be an assisted living home if the facility

provides housing and food services to its residents;

offers to provide or obtain for its residents assistance with activities of daily living;

offers personal assistance as defined in AS

47.33.990

; or

provides or offers any combination of these services;

does not include

a correctional facility;

an emergency shelter;

a program licensed under AS

47.10.310

for runaway minors;

a type of entity listed in AS

47.32.010(b)(5)

, (8), (9), (10), (11), or (12);

“child placement agency” means an agency that arranges for placement of a child

in a foster home, residential child care facility, or adoptive home; or

for guardianship purposes;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of health and social services;

“crisis stabilization center” means

a facility, or a part or unit of a facility, that has been designed to evaluate, stabilize, and treat, on a short-term basis and without the use of hospitalization, individuals experiencing an acute behavioral health crisis;

a 23-hour crisis stabilization center;

a crisis residential center; or

a subacute facility;

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services;

“entity” means an entity listed in AS

47.32.010(b)

;

“foster home” means a place where the adult head of household provides 24-hour care on a continuing basis to one or more children who are apart from their parents;

“freestanding birth center” means a facility that is not a part of a hospital and that provides a birth service to maternal clients;

“frontier extended stay clinic” means a rural health clinic that is authorized to provide 24-hour care to one or more individuals;

“home health agency” means a public agency or private organization, or a subdivision of a public agency or private organization, that primarily engages in providing skilled nursing services in combination with physical therapy, occupational therapy, speech therapy, or services provided by a home health aide to an individual in the individual’s home, an assisted living home, or another residential setting; in this paragraph,

“public agency” means an agency operated by the state or a local government;

“subdivision” means a component of a multi-function facility or home health agency, such as the home health care division of a hospital or the division of a public agency, that independently meets the requirements for licensure as a home health agency;

“hospice” or “agency providing hospice services or operating hospice programs” means a program that provides hospice services;

“hospice services” means a range of interdisciplinary palliative and supportive services

provided in a home or at an inpatient facility to persons who are terminally ill and to those persons’ families in order to meet their physical, psychological, social, emotional, and spiritual needs; and

based on hospice philosophy; for purposes of this subparagraph, “hospice philosophy” means a philosophy that is life affirming, recognizes dying as a normal process of living, focuses on maintaining the quality of remaining life, neither hastens nor postpones death, strengthens the client’s role in making informed decisions about care, and stresses the delivery of services in the least restrictive setting possible and with the least amount of technology necessary by volunteers and professionals who are trained to help a client with the physical, social, psychological, spiritual, and emotional issues related to terminal illness so that the client can feel better prepared for the death that is to come;

“hospital” means a public or private institution or establishment devoted primarily to providing diagnosis, treatment, or care over a continuous period of 24 hours each day for two or more unrelated individuals suffering from illness, physical or mental disease, injury or deformity, or any other condition for which medical or surgical services would be appropriate; “hospital” does not include a frontier extended stay clinic;

“intermediate care facility for individuals with an intellectual disability or related condition” has the meaning given in 42 C.F.R. 440.150;

“licensed entity” means an entity that has a license issued under this chapter;

“maternity home” means a place of residence the primary function of which is to give care, with or without compensation, to pregnant individuals, regardless of age, or that provides care, as needed, to mothers and their newborn infants;

“nursing facility” means a facility that is primarily engaged in providing skilled nursing care or rehabilitative services and related services for those who, because of their mental or physical condition, require care and services above the level of room and board; “nursing facility” does not include a facility that is primarily for the care and treatment of mental diseases;

“residential child care facility” means a place, staffed by employees, where one or more children who are apart from their parents receive 24-hour care on a continuing basis;

“residential psychiatric treatment center” means a secure or semi-secure facility, or an inpatient program in another facility, that provides, under the direction of a physician, psychiatric diagnostic, evaluation, and treatment services on a 24-hour-a-day basis to children with severe emotional or behavioral disorders;

“runaway shelter” means a facility housing a runaway child;

“rural health clinic”

means a facility or clinic that is authorized to provide health care services and is located in a rural area;

includes a frontier extended stay clinic;

does not include a rehabilitation agency or a facility primarily for the care and treatment of mental diseases.

History.

(§ 34 ch 57 SLA 2005; am § 27 ch 42 SLA 2013; am § 8 ch 28 SLA 2020)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2020, the paragraphs in this section were reorganized to maintain alphabetical order.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective July 28, 2020, added (22) [now (5)].